Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.710.080

Charter school authorizers.

The following entities may be authorizers of charter schools:

(1) The commission may exercise the authority granted under this section for charter schools located anywhere in the state; and

(2) A school district board of directors may exercise the authority granted under this section only after receiving approval from the state board of education under RCW 28A.710.090, and only for charter schools located within the school district's boundaries.

[ 2016 c 241 s 108. Prior: 2013 c 2 s 207 (Initiative Measure No. 1240, approved November 6, 2012).]